Utah statutes.
4-35-5.   Commissioner to act upon certification by committee -- Deposit required.

(1)  The commissioner initiates operations to control the insect infestation in the designated area or areas:

(a)  upon certification by the committee under Subsection 4-35-4(2); and

(b)  upon deposit of the owner's and lessee's projected proportionate share of the costs.

(2)  The commissioner and the members of the committee may suspend or terminate control operations upon a determination that the operations will not significantly reduce the insect population in the designated emergency area.

